Utah statutes.
4-1-3.5.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.
The Department of Agriculture and Food and its divisions shall comply with the
procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act, in their adjudicative proceedings.
